trunk/apertium-eo-es/apertium-eo-es.eo.dix
<pardef n="i__vbtr">
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>as</l>        <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>is</l>        <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>os</l>        <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="fti"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="cni"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>us</l>        <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="fts"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ita</l>       <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ita</l>       <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>itaj</l>      <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>itan</l>      <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>itajn</l>     <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ita</l>       <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>itan</l>      <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ata</l>       <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ataj</l>      <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>atan</l>      <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>atajn</l>     <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ata</l>       <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>atan</l>      <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>onta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp2"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>onta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ontaj</l>     <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp3"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>inta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>intaj</l>     <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ante</l>      <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inte</l>      <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="gerpast"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ita</l>       <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>itaj</l>      <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ita</l>       <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ata</l>       <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ataj</l>      <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ata</l>       <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>igi</l>       <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igas</l>      <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igis</l>      <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igos</l>      <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="fti"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igus</l>      <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="cni"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igus</l>      <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="fts"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igita</l>     <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igita</l>     <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igitaj</l>    <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igitan</l>    <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igitajn</l>   <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igita</l>     <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igitan</l>    <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igata</l>     <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igataj</l>    <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igatan</l>    <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igatajn</l>   <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igata</l>     <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igatan</l>    <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igonta</l>    <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp2"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igonta</l>    <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igontaj</l>   <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iginta</l>    <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp3"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iginta</l>    <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igintaj</l>   <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igante</l>    <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iginte</l>    <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="gerpast"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igu</l>       <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igita</l>     <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igitaj</l>    <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igita</l>     <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igata</l>     <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igataj</l>    <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igata</l>     <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>iĝi</l>       <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝas</l>      <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝis</l>      <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝos</l>      <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="fti"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝus</l>      <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="cni"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝus</l>      <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="fts"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝinta</l>     <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝinta</l>     <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝintaj</l>    <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝintan</l>    <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝintajn</l>   <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝinta</l>     <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝintan</l>    <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝanta</l>     <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝantaj</l>    <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝatan</l>    <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="aflikti">            <i>aflikt</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="aludi">            <i>alud</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="antaŭenpuŝi">            <i>antaŭenpuŝ</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="asigni">            <i>asign</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="balai">            <i>bala</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="brakumi">            <i>brakum</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="civilizi">            <i>civiliz</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="demandi">            <i>demand</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="dikti">            <i>dikt</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="disvolvi">            <i>disvolv</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="dungi">            <i>dung</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="ekzameni">            <i>ekzamen</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="elpaki">            <i>elpak</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="elŝiri">            <i>elŝir</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="escepti">            <i>escept</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="fandi">            <i>fand</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="fiŝi">            <i>fiŝ</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="formanĝi">            <i>formanĝ</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="froti">            <i>frot</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="grati">            <i>grat</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="imagi">            <i>imag</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="intenci">            <i>intenc</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="kalkuli">            <i>kalkul</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="knedi">            <i>kned</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="koncerni">            <i>koncern</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="konsoli">            <i>konsol</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="kortuŝi">            <i>kortuŝ</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="kunporti">            <i>kunport</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="levi">            <i>lev</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="malami">            <i>malam</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="malhardi">            <i>malhard</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="mallogi">            <i>mallog</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="mamnutri">            <i>mamnutr</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="mezuri">            <i>mezur</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="naturalizi">            <i>naturaliz</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="okupi">            <i>okup</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="panumi">            <i>panum</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="perdi">            <i>perd</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="planti">            <i>plant</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="povi">            <i>pov</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="prifriponi">            <i>prifripon</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="procezi">            <i>procez</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="punkti">            <i>punkt</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="rearmi">            <i>rearm</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="rekomenci">            <i>rekomenc</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="reprodukti">            <i>reprodukt</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="rikolti">            <i>rikolt</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="sarki">            <i>sark</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="signi">            <i>sign</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="sorĉi">            <i>sorĉ</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="subaĉeti">            <i>subaĉet</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="supernutri">            <i>supernutr</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="teksi">            <i>teks</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="trabizi">            <i>trabiz</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="traŭmatizi">            <i>traŭmatiz</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="tuŝi">            <i>tuŝ</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="vergi">            <i>verg</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="voĉlegi">            <i>voĉleg</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="ĉizi">            <i>ĉiz</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="ŝovi">            <i>ŝov</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="retiri">            <i>retir</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="sturme preni">            <i>sturme<b/>pren</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="revoki">            <i>revok</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="subuzi">            <i>subuz</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
